Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.375

Registered agent of foreign corporation.

Every foreign corporation registered to conduct affairs in this state shall have and continuously maintain in this state a registered agent in accordance with Article 4 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4122; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 75.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.